Tennessee, session 114, SB1629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131(a)(2)(B)(i)(v), is amended
by deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-131(a)(2)(B)(i)(w), is amended
by deleting "Handgun possession" and substituting "Unlawful handgun possession or carrying of
a firearm".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1301, is amended by deleting
subdivision (2).
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (a).
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (e).
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1307, is amended by deleting
subsection (g).
SECTION 7. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1308(a), is amended by
deleting subdivisions (a)(8) and (9).
SECTION 8. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1309, is amended by deleting
subdivision (e)(8) and substituting:
(8)
(A) Persons possessing a knife or handgun, who are not prohibited from
possessing a knife or handgun, while within or on a public park, natural area,
SB1629
010451
- 1 -

historic park, nature trail, campground, forest, greenway, waterway, or other
similar public place;
(B) This subdivision (e)(8) does not prohibit a school offering the grades
kindergarten through twelve (K-12) from restricting access to an area of property
listed in subdivision (e)(8)(A) and denying persons carrying a firearm access to
the restricted area, unless the person is otherwise authorized to carry the firearm,
or denying persons carrying a knife access to the restricted area.
SECTION 9. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1311, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
It is not an offense for a person authorized to carry a handgun pursuant to § 39-
17-1351 or § 39-17-1366 or a person who is not prohibited from carrying a firearm, to do
so in any state or local park, on a public greenway or other recreational property, or, to
the extent permitted by federal law, within or on property designated by the federal
government as a national park, forest, preserve, historic park, military park, trail, or
recreation area.
SECTION 10. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1313(a), is amended by
deleting "who lawfully carries a handgun pursuant to § 39-17-1307(g)" and substituting "who is
not prohibited from possessing or carrying a firearm".
SECTION 11. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) Except as provided in this section, it is an offense for a juvenile to:
(1) Knowingly possess a handgun; or
(2) Carry, with the intent to go armed, a firearm.
SECTION 12. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319(c)(1), is amended by
deleting "Illegal possession of a handgun by a juvenile" and substituting "A violation of this
- 2 - 010451

section".
SECTION 13. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319(c)(3), is amended by
deleting "handgun" and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 14. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319(d), is amended by
deleting "handgun" wherever it appears and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 15. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319(d)(1), is further
amended by adding the following new subdivisions:
(I) Engaging in the lawful protection of livestock from predatory animals; or
(J) Except as provided in § 39-17-1309, transporting or storing an unloaded
firearm in a motor vehicle while on or utilizing a public or private parking area if:
(i) The juvenile is licensed to drive a motor vehicle pursuant to title 55,
chapter 50, part 3;
(ii) The juvenile's motor vehicle is parked in a location where the motor
vehicle is permitted to be; and
(iii) The firearm being transported or stored in the motor vehicle:
(a) Is kept from ordinary observation if the juvenile is in the motor
vehicle; or
(b) Is kept from ordinary observation and locked within the trunk,
glove box, or interior of the juvenile's motor vehicle or a container
securely affixed to the motor vehicle if the juvenile is not in the motor
vehicle.
SECTION 16. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1319(e), is amended by
deleting "handgun" and substituting "firearm".
SECTION 17. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1359(g)(2)(B), is amended by
deleting "or § 39-17-1311(b)(1)(H)(ii)".
- 3 - 010451

SECTION 18. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-1364, is amended by deleting
the language "Notwithstanding § 39-17-1307, or any other law," and substituting
"Notwithstanding another law to the contrary,".
SECTION 19. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3051(b)(2)(H), is amended by
deleting the subdivision.
SECTION 20. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3051(b)(2)(I), is amended by
deleting "Handgun possession" and substituting "Unlawful handgun possession or carrying of a
firearm".
SECTION 21. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 4 - 010451